test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-soovsa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - soovsâ: # 2A
    soovsâ+N+Sg+Nom: soovsâ
    soovsâ+N+Sg+Gen: soksâm
    soovsâ+N+Sg+Acc: soksâm
    soovsâ+N+Sg+Ill: soksâmân
    soovsâ+N+Sg+Loc: soksâmist
    soovsâ+N+Sg+Com: soksâmáin
    soovsâ+N+Sg+Abe: soksâmttáá
    soovsâ+N+Ess: soovsân               #soksâmin
    soovsâ+N+Par: soovsâd               #soksâmid
    soovsâ+N+Pl+Nom: soksâmeh
    soovsâ+N+Pl+Gen: soksâmij
    soovsâ+N+Pl+Acc: soksâmijd
    soovsâ+N+Pl+Ill: soksâmáid
    soovsâ+N+Pl+Loc: soksâmijn
    soovsâ+N+Pl+Com: soksâmijguin
    soovsâ+N+Pl+Abe: soksâmijttáá
